Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-158
Filing of certificate of authority.

(RULLCA 804) Unless the
Secretary of State determines that an application for a certificate of authority
does not comply with the filing requirements of the Nebraska Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act, the Secretary of State, upon payment of all filing
fees, shall file the application of a foreign limited liability company, prepare,
sign, and file a certificate of authority to transact business in this state,
and send a copy of the filed certificate, together with a receipt for the
fees, to the company or its representative.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 58.